Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3 Skill Based Amusement Games

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-301.
Skill based amusement games authorization; commission authority; applicability.

Skill based amusement games operating in the state in accordance with the provisions of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 shall be allowed to continue operation in accordance with the requirements of this article and rules of the commission.

A skill based amusement game that meets the requirements of this article shall be approved by the commission to operate in the state or it shall be removed from the state by the vendor.

The commission shall promulgate any necessary rules to administer and enforce this article. The rules may include provisions for the control, supervision, direction, discipline, suspension or fining of any person for violation of this article or rules adopted in accordance with this article.

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-302.
Laboratory report required.

Each vendor shall provide for a nationally recognized, independent gaming laboratory approved by the commission to submit to the commission a general functional evaluation laboratory report regarding the software installed on each skill based amusement game indicating whether the skill based amusement game is in compliance with this article. Any skill based amusement game that does not meet the requirements of this article shall immediately be removed from the state by the vendor.

Any alterations, modifications or updates to the software or hardware of any skill based amusement game shall require the vendor to submit to the commission a new laboratory report as required under subsection (a) of this section before the game may be used for play at an establishment.

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-303.
Restrictions on operation of skill based amusement games.

No skill based amusement game shall allow a game play of more than three dollars ($3.00) per play.

No skill based amusement game shall allow a payout of more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per play.

No establishment shall have more than four (4) skill based amusement games operating for play at any one (1) time.

An operator shall not locate a skill based amusement game in an area of the establishment into which a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years may enter. An operator shall conspicuously mark each area of the establishment containing a skill based amusement game as an age restricted area. The operator shall not allow a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to play a skill based amusement game.

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-304.
Required permits and licenses; applicable fees; tax imposition; taxation rate; distribution.

Any person seeking to obtain or renew any license, permit or decal as required under this section shall submit an application to the commission on a form prescribed by the commission. Upon approval of an application by the commission:

An operator shall be issued a permit and required to pay an annual fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) to have skill based amusement games operating for play in the operator’s establishment;

A vendor shall be issued a license and required to pay an annual fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) to possess and distribute skill based amusement games.

Skill based amusement games that meet the requirements of this article shall bear a commission issued decal that identifies the vendor of the game. Each decal shall be valid for one (1) year. No skill based amusement game shall be operational unless it bears a current commission issued decal. The commission shall charge the vendor a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a decal. Each decal shall include the bucking horse and rider emblem.

The fees required under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be paid on or before July 1 of each year and shall be deposited in the commission gaming account created under 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 and hereby continued under this subsection. Funds within the account are continuously appropriated to the commission to pay for reasonable expenses incurred to administer this article.

Taxes shall be calculated and paid on a weekly basis based on the net proceeds earned during the prior week on skill based amusement games. On a weekly basis, the vendor shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the net proceeds earned during the prior week on the vendor’s skill based amusement games. The taxes imposed under this subsection may be prepaid as provided by rule of the commission. The commission shall remit these monies to the state treasurer for deposit in the commission gaming account and for distribution of the tax as follows:

Forty-five percent (45%) to the county and the city or town in which the skill based amusement game is located, in equal shares, or to the county alone if the skill based amusement game is not located within the boundaries of a city or town;

Forty-five percent (45%) to the school foundation program account;

Ten percent (10%) to the commission gaming account.

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-305.
Operator permit, vendor license and skill based amusement game decal approval; criteria; review.

The commission shall, not more than sixty (60) days after the date of receipt of an application or application for renewal for an operator permit, vendor license or skill based amusement game decal under W.S.

11-25-304

either:

Issue the permit, license or decal; or

Deny the application based on the grounds that the applicant failed to qualify as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

The commission shall deny any application under this article upon finding any of the following:

The applicant has been convicted of, forfeited bail on or pleaded guilty within ten (10) years before the date of filing the application to:

A crime involving theft, dishonesty or fraud;

Bribery or unlawfully influencing a public official;

A felony involving physical harm to an individual; or

Any other crime identified by commission rules that negatively impacts the applicant’s credibility or the security, integrity or fairness of play of skill based amusement games operated by the applicant.

The applicant tampered with submitted documentation or concealed, failed to disclose or otherwise attempted to mislead the commission with respect to any material fact contained in the application or contained in any other information required of or submitted by an applicant to the commission;

The applicant failed or refused to cooperate in the investigation of a crime relating to gambling, corruption of a public official or any organized criminal activity;

The applicant failed to otherwise meet the requirements imposed under this article.

Operators shall have a continuing duty to disclose in writing any material change in the information provided in the application to the commission, including:

Changes to names and contact information;

Arrests, convictions, guilty pleas, disciplinary actions or license denials in Wyoming and any other jurisdiction;

Any civil action brought against the operator or establishment; and

Any other information required by commission rules.

If the commission denies an application or intends to revoke or suspend a license or permit issued under this article, it shall notify the applicant, licensee or permittee in writing, stating the grounds for denial, revocation or suspension and informing the person of a right to submit, before not more than thirty (30) days, any additional documentation relating to the grounds of denial, revocation or suspension. Upon receiving any additional documentation, the commission shall reconsider its decision and inform the applicant before not more than twenty (20) days of the result of the reconsideration. A denial of an application under this article shall be subject to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-306.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

2021 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.